Maryland, session 2026, SB0754.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 1–101(k) through (t) of Article – Land Use of the Annotated Code of
Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 1–101(l) through (u), respectively.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Land Use
1–101.
(a) In this division the following words have the meanings indicated.
(K) “NATURAL RESOURCE” INCLUDES LAND, WATER, FORESTS, WETLANDS,
FLOODPLAINS, HABITAT AREAS, SENSITIVE AREAS, AND OTHER AREAS THAT
PROVIDE ECOLOGICAL, HYDROLOGICAL, OR CONSERVATION VALUE.
7–101.
To encourage the preservation of natural resources or the provision of affordable
housing and to facilitate orderly development and growth, a local jurisdiction that exercises
authority granted by this division may enact, and is encouraged to enact, local laws
providing for or requiring:
(1) the planning, staging, or provision of adequate public facilities and
affordable housing;
(2) off–site improvements or the dedication of land for public facilities
essential for a development;
(3) THE PRESERVATION OF NATURAL RESOURCES THROUGH:
(I) THE TRANSFER OF DEVELOPMENT RIGHTS;
(II) CONSERVATION OR PRESERVATION EASEMENTS;
(III) OPEN SPACE OR AGRICULTURAL LAND PRESERVATION
PROGRAMS;
(IV) CLUSTER OR CONSERVATION SUBDIVISION DESIGN;

SENATE BILL 754 3
(V) RIPARIAN BUFFER, FLOODPLAIN, OR WETLAND
PROTECTION REQUIREMENTS; AND
(VI) OTHER LAND USE OR ZONING MECHANISMS DESIGNED TO
PROVIDE LONG–TERM OR PERMANENT PROTECTION OF NATURAL RESOURCES;
[(3)] (4) moderately priced dwelling unit programs;
[(4)] (5) mixed use developments;
[(5)] (6) cluster developments;
[(6)] (7) planned unit developments;
[(7)] (8) alternative subdivision requirements that:
(i) meet minimum performance standards set by the local
jurisdiction; and
(ii) reduce infrastructure costs;
[(8)] (9) floating zones;
[(9)] (10) incentive zoning; and
[(10)] (11) performance zoning.
7–103.
The authority granted under this subtitle is not intended to limit a local jurisdiction’s
authority to:
(1) exercise any planning and zoning powers not expressly authorized
under this subtitle; or
(2) adopt other methods to:
(i) facilitate orderly development and growth;
(ii) encourage the preservation of natural resources; or
(iii) provide affordable housing.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.